Illinois, session 104th, HB4929.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device Rebate Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The General Assembly declares that it 7is the public policy of the State to promote and encourage the 8use of privately-owned carbon capture devices as a means to 9improve air quality and reduce the risks from global warming 10in the State and to meet the requirements of the federal Clean 11Air Act. The General Assembly further declares that the State 12can play a leadership role in increasing usage of 13privately-owned carbon capture devices. 14    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 15    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 16Agency.17    "Eligible applicant" means a person or family whose income 18does not exceed 500% of the poverty guidelines updated 19periodically in the Federal Register by the U.S. Department of 20Health and Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 219902(2) for the current State fiscal year and who may not be 22claimed as a dependent.  HB4929- 2 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1    "Eligible device" means a privately-owned carbon capture 2device that meets the requirements of this Act and that has not 3already received a rebate under this Act.4    "Low-income applicant" means a person or family whose 5income does not exceed 80% of the regional or county median 6income for the current State fiscal year, as established by 7the United States Department of Housing and Urban 8Development's Illinois Income Limits by metropolitan area and 9county.10    "Privately-owned carbon capture device" means a 11commercially-manufactured carbon capture device that 12measurably captures carbon using biological processes, 13including, but not limited to, microalgae photosynthesis, that 14is intended for use on residential property, and that is owned 15by the resident or property owner. "Privately-owned carbon 16capture device" does not include carbon capture devices that:17        (1) capture carbon using non-biological processes;18        (2) are intended for use on commercial property; or19        (3) are owned by commercial entities. 20    Section 15. Rulemaking. The Agency shall adopt rules as 21necessary to implement and administer this Act. Such rules 22shall be consistent with applicable provisions of the Clean 23Air Act and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. The 24Agency shall dedicate sufficient resources to implement and 25administer Section 20 of this Act.    HB4929- 3 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1    Section 20. Carbon capture device rebate.2    (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, and continuing as long as 3funds are available, each eligible applicant may apply for a 4rebate, in the amounts set forth under this subsection, 5following the purchase of an eligible device in the State. The 6Agency shall accept applications and issue rebates consistent 7with the provisions of this Act and any implementing rules 8adopted by the Agency. In no event shall a rebate amount exceed 9the purchase price of the eligible device. The amounts of the 10carbon capture device rebate are as follows:11        (1) beginning July 1, 2029, a rebate equal to 50% of 12    the purchase price, excluding taxes and fees, for eligible 13    applicants toward the purchase of a new or used eligible 14    device; low-income applicants are eligible for an 15    additional 10% rebate; and16        (2) beginning July 1, 2032, a rebate equal to 40% of 17    the purchase price, excluding taxes and fees, for eligible 18    applicants toward the purchase of a new or used eligible 19    device; low-income applicants are eligible for an 20    additional 10% rebate.21    (b) To be eligible to receive a rebate, a purchaser must:22        (1) reside in Illinois, both at the time the eligible 23    device was purchased and at the time the rebate is issued;24        (2) purchase the eligible device in Illinois on or 25    after July 1, 2026 and be the owner of the device at the   HB4929- 4 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1    time the rebate is issued; rented or leased devices, 2    devices purchased from an out-of-state retailer, and 3    devices delivered to or received by the purchaser 4    out-of-state are not eligible for a rebate under this Act.5        (3) apply for the rebate within 180 days after the 6    eligible device purchase date, and provide to the Agency 7    proof of residence, proof of device ownership, and proof 8    that the device was purchased in the State, including a 9    copy of a purchase agreement noting an Illinois seller; 10    the purchaser must notify the Agency of any changes in 11    residency or ownership of the device that occur between 12    application for a rebate and issuance of a rebate;13        (4) apply for the rebate during an open rebate cycle, 14    as identified by the Agency; and15        (5) certify that the purchaser qualifies as an 16    eligible applicant and a low-income applicant, if 17    applicable.18    (c) The Agency shall make available in application 19materials methods for purchasers to identify as low-income 20applicants. The Agency shall prioritize the review of 21qualified applications from low-income applicant purchasers 22and award rebates to qualified purchasers accordingly.23    (d) The purchaser must retain ownership of the eligible 24device for a minimum of 12 consecutive months immediately 25after the eligible device purchase date. The purchaser must 26continue to reside in Illinois during that time frame. Rebate   HB4929- 5 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1recipients who fail to satisfy any of the above criteria will 2be required to reimburse the Agency all or part of the original 3rebate amount and shall notify the Agency within 60 days of 4failing to satisfy the criteria.5    (e) Rebates administered under this Section shall be 6available for both new and used devices.7    (f) A rebate administered under this Act may only be 8applied for and awarded one time per eligible device. A rebate 9may only be applied for and awarded once per purchaser in any 1010-year period.11    (g) For program auditing purposes, the Agency may request 12from a rebate recipient additional information and 13documentation evidencing eligibility for a rebate issued on or 14after July 1, 2029, including copies of income tax returns 15that corroborate the certification referenced in paragraph (5) 16of subsection (b). If requested by the Agency, a rebate 17recipient shall provide the information and documentation 18within the timeframe specified in the Agency's request. If the 19rebate recipient fails to provide the information and 20documentation requested by the Agency by the specified 21deadline, or if the information and documentation provided 22evidences that the rebate recipient was not eligible for the 23rebate or the rebate recipient fails to corroborate the 24certification referenced in paragraph (5) of subsection (b), 25the rebate recipient may be required to reimburse the Agency 26all or part of the original rebate amount, according to rules   HB4929- 6 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1adopted by the Agency. 2    Section 25. User fees. 3    (a) A user fee equal to 5% of the original purchase price 4of each privately-owned carbon capture device sold in Illinois 5shall be collected by the retailer at the point of sale.6    (b) The Department of Revenue shall collect user fees from 7the retailer and deposit these fees into the Privately-Owned 8Carbon Capture Device Rebate Fund.9    (c) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules 10implementing and administering this Section. 11    Section 30. Appropriations from the Privately-Owned Carbon 12Capture Device Rebate Fund. 13    (a) The Agency shall estimate the amount of user fees 14expected to be collected under this Act for each State fiscal 15year. User fee funds shall be deposited into and distributed 16from the Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device Rebate Fund in 17the following manner:18        (1) Through fiscal year 2028, amounts may be 19    appropriated to the Agency from the Privately-Owned Carbon 20    Capture Device Rebate Fund to pay its costs of 21    administering the programs authorized by Section 20 of 22    this Act; amounts may also be appropriated to the 23    Department of Revenue from the Privately-Owned Carbon 24    Capture Device Rebate Fund to pay the Department of   HB4929- 7 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1    Revenue's costs of administering the programs authorized 2    under this Act.3        (2) In fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year 4    thereafter, after appropriation of the amounts authorized 5    by paragraph (1), the remaining moneys estimated to be 6    collected during each fiscal year shall be appropriated to 7    the Agency to fund the program authorized in Section 20.8        (3) Amounts appropriated to, transferred to, and 9    deposited into the Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device 10    Rebate Fund from the General Revenue Fund or any other 11    fund shall be distributed from the Privately-Owned Carbon 12    Capture Device Rebate Fund to fund the program authorized 13    in Section 20. 14    Section 35. Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device Rebate 15Fund creation. A special fund in the State treasury called the 16Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device Rebate Fund is created, 17into which shall be transferred the user fees as provided in 18Section 25 and any other revenues, deposits, State 19appropriations, contributions, grants, gifts, bequests, 20legacies of money and securities, or transfers as provided by 21law from, without limitation, governmental entities, private 22sources, foundations, trade associations, industry 23organizations, and not-for-profit organizations. 24    Section 80. The State Finance Act is amended by adding   HB4929- 8 -LRB104 20253 BDA 33704 b1Section 5.1038 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)3    Sec. 5.1038. The Privately-Owned Carbon Capture Device 4Rebate Fund. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.